District of Columbia statutes.
26-1155.01

Applicability.

(a)

Subchapters I through III of this chapter shall apply 60 days after the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The provisions of this chapter shall be interpreted and applied to the fullest extent practical in a manner consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations. Nothing in this chapter is intended to preempt federal laws and regulations.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 501, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (225 days) addition of provisions to standardize licensing and registration application requirements using the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry , see §§ 2-11 of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System Conformity Temporary Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-146, Dec. 17, 2014, 61 DCR 8063).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 501 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a subchapter concerning conformity with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System, see §§ 2-11 of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System Conformity Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-374, July 10, 2014, 61 DCR 7230).